Washington statutes.
RCW 41.06.580

Energy facility site evaluation council—Certain personnel exempted from chapter.

In addition to the exemptions provided under RCW 41.06.070, the provisions of this chapter do not apply to the following positions at the energy facility site evaluation council: The director; the personal secretary to the director and the council chair; and up to two professional staff members.

[ 2022 c 183 s 14.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 183: See note following RCW 80.50.010.